Illinois, session 104th, SB671.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Energy Assistance Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 20/1)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 1401)7    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the Energy Assistance Act.9(Source: P.A. 92-690, eff. 7-18-02.)